Oklahoma, session 2026, SB286.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2357.602 of Title 68, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. For tax year 2026 and subsequent tax years, there shall be


allowed a credit against the tax imposed pursuant to Section 2355 of


Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes in an amount equal to fifty


percent (50%) of a reasonable and necessary fee amount approved by


the court for a licensed attorney that provides pro bono counsel to


adoptive parents that results in the filing of a certificate of


decree of adoption as provided in Section 7505-6.6 of Title 10 of


the Oklahoma Statutes.



Req. No. 1561 Page 1


B. If the credit authorized pursuant to this subsection exceeds


the tax imposed by Section 2355 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma


Statutes, the excess amount shall be refunded to the taxpayer.


C. The Oklahoma Tax Commission may promulgate rules or


prescribe forms to verify taxpayer qualification for the credit


provided in this section.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1561 QD 12/30/2024 11:16:48 PM































Req. No. 1561 Page 2